Washington statutes.
RCW 19.77.060

Assignment of trademark, registration, or application—Fee—Rules.

Any trademark and its registration or application for registration hereunder shall be assignable with the good will of the business in which the trademark is used, or with that part of the good will of the business connected with the use of and symbolized by the trademark. An assignment by an instrument in writing duly executed and acknowledged, or the designation of a legal representative, successor, or agent for service shall be recorded by the secretary of state on request when accompanied by a fee, as set by rule by the secretary of state, payable to the secretary of state. On request, upon recording of the assignment and payment of a further fee of five dollars, the secretary of state shall issue in the name of the assignee a new certificate for the remainder of the unexpired original or renewal term of the registration. An assignment of any registration or application for registration under this chapter shall be void as against any subsequent purchaser for a valuable consideration without notice, unless it is recorded with the secretary of state within three months after the date thereof or prior to such subsequent purchase.

[ 1994 c 60 s 4; 1982 c 35 s 183; 1955 c 211 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.